Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-3] Variances and exemptions.
The director may issue variances or exemptions from the regulations issued
pursuant to section 340E-2 under conditions and in a manner consistent with the
public interest; however, such variances or exemptions are not permitted under
conditions less stringent than the conditions under which variances and
exemptions may be granted under the Federal Act. [L 1976, c 84, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next